New Mexico, session 2026, HB107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 41-5-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1976, Chapter 2, Section 3, as amended) is amended to read: "41-5-3. DEFINITIONS.--As used in the Medical Malpractice Act: A. "advisory board" means the patient's compensation fund advisory board; B. "control" means equity ownership in a business entity that: (1) represents more than fifty percent of the total voting power of the business entity; or (2) has a value of more than fifty percent of that business entity; C. "fund" means the patient's compensation fund; D. "health care provider" means a person, a corporation, an organization, a facility or an institution licensed or certified by this state to provide health care or professional services as a doctor of medicine, a hospital, an outpatient health care facility, a doctor of osteopathy, a chiropractor, [podiatrist] a podiatric physician, a nurse anesthetist, a physician's assistant, a certified nurse practitioner, a clinical nurse specialist or a certified nurse-midwife or a business entity that is organized, incorporated or formed pursuant to the laws of New Mexico that provides health care services primarily through natural persons identified in this subsection. "Health care provider" does not mean a person or entity protected pursuant to the Tort Claims Act or the Federal Tort Claims Act; E. "hospital" means a facility licensed as a hospital in this state that offers [in-patient] inpatient services, nursing or overnight care on a twenty-four-hour basis for diagnosing, treating and providing medical, psychological or surgical care for three or more separate persons who have a physical or mental illness, disease, injury or rehabilitative condition or are pregnant and may offer emergency services. "Hospital" includes a hospital's parent corporation, subsidiary corporations or affiliates if incorporated or registered in New Mexico; employees and locum tenens providing services at the hospital; and agency nurses providing services at the hospital. "Hospital" does not mean a person or an entity protected pursuant to the Tort Claims Act or the Federal Tort Claims Act; F. "independent outpatient health care facility" means a health care facility that is an ambulatory surgical center, an urgent care facility or a free-standing emergency room that is not, directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controlled or under common control with a hospital. "Independent outpatient health care facility" includes a facility's employees, locum tenens providers and agency nurses providing services at the facility. "Independent outpatient health care facility" does not mean a person or entity protected pursuant to the Tort Claims Act or the Federal Tort Claims Act; G. "independent provider" means a doctor of medicine, doctor of osteopathy, chiropractor, [podiatrist] podiatric physician, nurse anesthetist, physician's assistant, certified nurse practitioner, clinical nurse specialist or certified nurse-midwife who is not an employee of a hospital or outpatient health care facility. "Independent provider" does not mean a person or entity protected pursuant to the Tort Claims Act or the Federal Tort Claims Act. "Independent provider" includes: (1) a health care facility that is: (a) licensed pursuant to the [Public Health Act] Health Care Code as an outpatient facility; (b) not an ambulatory surgical center, an urgent care facility or a free-standing emergency room; and (c) not hospital-controlled; and (2) a business entity that is not a hospital or outpatient health care facility that employs or consists of members who are licensed or certified as doctors of medicine, doctors of osteopathy, chiropractors, [podiatrists] podiatric physicians, nurse anesthetists, physician's assistants, certified nurse practitioners, clinical nurse specialists or certified nurse-midwives and the business entity's employees; H. "insurer" means an insurance company engaged in writing health care provider malpractice liability insurance in this state; I. "malpractice claim" includes any cause of action arising in this state against a health care provider for medical treatment, lack of medical treatment or other claimed departure from accepted standards of health care that proximately results in injury to the patient, whether the patient's claim or cause of action sounds in tort or contract, and includes but is not limited to actions based on battery or wrongful death; "malpractice claim" does not include a cause of action arising out of the driving, flying or nonmedical acts involved in the operation, use or maintenance of a vehicular or aircraft ambulance; J. "medical care and related benefits" means all reasonable medical, surgical, physical rehabilitation and custodial services and includes drugs, prosthetic devices and other similar materials reasonably necessary in the provision of such services; K. "occurrence" means all [injuries to a patient caused by health care providers' successive acts or omissions that combined concurrently to create a malpractice claim] claims for damages from all persons arising from harm to a single patient, no matter how many health care providers, errors or omissions contributed to the harm; L. "outpatient health care facility" means an entity that is hospital-controlled and is licensed pursuant to the [Public Health Act] Health Care Code as an outpatient facility, including ambulatory surgical centers, free-standing emergency rooms, urgent care clinics, acute care centers and intermediate care facilities and includes a facility's employees, locum tenens providers and agency nurses providing services at the facility. "Outpatient health care facility" does not include: (1) independent providers; (2) independent outpatient health care facilities; or (3) individuals or entities protected pursuant to the Tort Claims Act or the Federal Tort Claims Act; M. "patient" means a natural person who received or should have received health care from a health care provider, under a contract, express or implied; and N. "superintendent" means the superintendent of insurance." SECTION 2. Section 41-5-6 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1992, Chapter 33, Section 4, as amended) is amended to read: "41-5-6. LIMITATION OF RECOVERY.-- A. Except for punitive damages and past and future medical care and related benefits, the aggregate dollar amount recoverable by all persons for or arising from any injury or death to a patient as a result of malpractice shall not exceed six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) per occurrence. [for malpractice claims brought against health care providers if the injury or death occurred prior to January 1, 2022. In jury cases, the jury shall not be given any instructions dealing with this limitation. B. Except for punitive damages and past and future medical care and related benefits, the aggregate dollar amount recoverable by all persons for or arising from any injury or death to a patient as a result of malpractice shall not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) per occurrence for malpractice claims against independent providers; provided that, beginning January 1, 2023, the per occurrence limit on recovery shall be adjusted annually by the consumer price index for all urban consumers. C. The aggregate dollar amount recoverable by all persons for or arising from any injury or death to a patient as a result of malpractice, except for punitive damages and past and future medical care and related benefits, shall not exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) for claims brought against an independent outpatient health care facility for an injury or death that occurred in calendar years 2022 and 2023. D. In calendar year 2024 and subsequent years, the aggregate dollar amount recoverable by all persons for or arising from an injury or death to a patient as a result of malpractice, except for punitive damages and past and future medical care and related benefits, shall not exceed the following amounts for claims brought against an independent outpatient health care facility: (1) for an injury or death that occurred in calendar year 2024, one million dollars ($1,000,000) per occurrence; and (2) for an injury or death that occurred in calendar year 2025 and thereafter, the amount provided in Paragraph (1) of this subsection, adjusted annually by the prior three-year average consumer price index for all urban consumers, per occurrence. E. In calendar year 2022 and subsequent calendar years, the aggregate dollar amount recoverable by all persons for or arising from any injury or death to a patient as a result of malpractice, except for punitive damages and past and future medical care and related benefits, shall not exceed the following amounts for claims brought against a hospital or a hospital-controlled outpatient health care facility: (1) for an injury or death that occurred in calendar year 2022, four million dollars ($4,000,000) per occurrence; (2) for an injury or death that occurred in calendar year 2023, four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000) per occurrence; (3) for an injury or death that occurred in calendar year 2024, five million dollars ($5,000,000) per occurrence; (4) for an injury or death that occurred in calendar year 2025, five million five hundred thousand dollars ($5,500,000) per occurrence; (5) for an injury or death that occurred in calendar year 2026, six million dollars ($6,000,000) per occurrence; and (6) for an injury or death that occurred in calendar year 2027 and each calendar year thereafter, the amount provided in Paragraph (5) of this subsection, adjusted annually by the consumer price index for all urban consumers, per occurrence. F. The aggregate dollar amounts provided in Subsections B through E of this section include payment to any person for any number of loss of consortium claims or other claims per occurrence that arise solely because of the injuries or death of the patient. G.] B. In jury cases, the jury shall not be given any instructions dealing with the limitations provided in this section. [H.] C. Except as provided in Section 41-5-7 NMSA 1978, the value of accrued medical care and related benefits shall not be subject to any limitation. [I. Except for an independent outpatient health care facility] D. A health care provider's personal liability is limited to [two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)] two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for monetary damages and medical care and related benefits as provided in Section 41-5-7 NMSA 1978. Any amount due from a judgment or settlement in excess of [two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)] two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) shall be paid from the fund [except as provided in Subsections J and K of this section. J. An independent outpatient health care facility's personal liability is limited to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for monetary damages and medical care and related benefits as provided in Section 41-5-7 NMSA 1978. Any amount due from a judgment or settlement in excess of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) shall be paid from the fund. K. Until January 1, 2027, amounts due from a judgment or settlement against a hospital or hospital-controlled outpatient health care facility in excess of seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000), excluding past and future medical expenses, shall be paid by the hospital or hospital-controlled outpatient health care facility and not by the fund. Beginning January 1, 2027, amounts due from a judgment or settlement against a hospital or hospital-controlled outpatient health care facility shall not be paid from the fund. L. The term "occurrence" shall not be construed in such a way as to limit recovery to only one maximum statutory payment if separate acts or omissions cause additional or enhanced injury or harm as a result of the separate acts or omissions. A patient who suffers two or more distinct injuries as a result of two or more different acts or omissions that occur at different times by one or more health care providers is entitled to up to the maximum statutory recovery for each injury]." SECTION 3. Section 41-5-7 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1992, Chapter 33, Section 5, as amended) is amended to read: "41-5-7. MEDICAL EXPENSES AND PUNITIVE DAMAGES.-- A. Awards of past and future medical care and related benefits shall not be subject to the limitations of recovery imposed in Section 41-5-6 NMSA 1978. B. The health care provider shall be liable for all medical care and related benefit payments until the total payments made by or on behalf of it for monetary damages and medical care and related benefits combined equals the health care provider's personal liability limit as provided in Subsection [I] D of Section 41-5-6 NMSA 1978, after which the payments shall be made by the fund. C. [Beginning January 1, 2027, any amounts due from a judgment or settlement against a hospital or outpatient health care facility shall not be paid from the fund if the injury or death occurred after December 31, 2026] Payments made from the fund for medical care and related benefits shall be made as expenses are incurred. D. This section shall not be construed to prevent a patient and a health care provider from entering into a settlement agreement whereby medical care and related benefits shall be provided for a limited period of time only or to a limited degree. E. A judgment of punitive damages against a health care provider shall be the personal liability of the health care provider. Punitive damages may only be awarded if the prevailing party demonstrates beyond a reasonable doubt that the health care provider acted with malice, willful intent to harm or wanton disregard for the rights or safety of others. Punitive damages shall not be paid from the fund or from the proceeds of the health care provider's insurance contract unless the contract expressly provides coverage. Nothing in Section 41-5-6 NMSA 1978 precludes the award of punitive damages to a patient. Nothing in this subsection authorizes the imposition of liability for punitive damages where that imposition would not be otherwise authorized by law. F. A punitive damage award against: (1) a hospital or a hospital-controlled outpatient health care facility shall not be in an amount that exceeds three times the applicable limitation on compensatory damages provided in Section 41-5-6 NMSA 1978; or (2) any other health care provider shall not be in an amount that exceeds the applicable limitation on compensatory damages provided in Section 41-5-6 NMSA 1978." SECTION 4. A new section of the Medical Malpractice Act is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] LIMITING ATTORNEY FEES.-- A. An attorney shall not contract for or collect a contingency fee for representing a person seeking damages in a malpractice claim in an amount that exceeds: (1) thirty percent of the first two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) recovered pursuant to a settlement agreement, an arbitration award or a judgment; (2) twenty-five percent of the portion recovered pursuant to a settlement agreement, an arbitration award or a judgment that is more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) but not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in value; (3) twenty percent of the portion recovered pursuant to a settlement agreement, an arbitration award or a judgment that is more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) but not more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in value; and (4) fifteen percent of the portion recovered pursuant to a settlement agreement, an arbitration award or a judgment that is more than one million dollars ($1,000,000) in value. B. Any amount recovered pursuant to a settlement agreement, an arbitration award or a judgment for a malpractice claim that is covered by the fund shall not contribute to an attorney's contingency fee." SECTION 5. APPLICABILITY.--The provisions of this act apply to all claims for medical malpractice that arise on or after the effective date of this act. - 14 -